Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made  a part of ORS chapter 279B.
SECTION 2. (1)(a) After  the effective date of this 2021 Act and before July 31, 2022, a
state contracting agency that awards  a public contract under ORS 279B.055, 279B.060 or
279B.070 shall use forms or electronic systems the  Director of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services specifies to report to the director not later than August 15, 2022:
(A) How  many procurements the state contracting agency solicited during the period
described in this subsection;
(B) The general nature of each procurement, including an estimate of the contract price;
and
(C) Which contract  preferences set forth in statute or administrative rule, if any, the
state contracting agency  applied in evaluating bids or proposals in the course of awarding
the public contracts.
(b) In the report described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection, each state contracting
agency shall also:
(A) State why the state contracting agency applied or did  not apply any applicable dis-
cretionary preferences; and
(B) Provide any other information or content the director requires for the report de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2)(a) During the period described in subsection (1) of  this section, the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services shall develop training materials and specify procedures and
best practices that state contracting agencies can use to determine which  contract prefer-
ences must or should apply to a procurement, which contract  preferences the state con-
tracting agency may apply at the state contracting agency’s discretion and how  to properly
apply appropriate preferences while evaluating bids and proposals for, and awarding, public
contracts.
(b) Upon completing the  training materials, procedures and practices described in para-
graph (a) of this subsection, the department shall  immediately make the training materials,
procedures and  practices available to state contracting agencies and provide any needed
guidance on implementation.
(3)(a) Not later than September 30, 2022, the department shall submit to an  interim
committee of the Legislative Assembly related to public procurement  a report that summa-
rizes the information described in subsection (1) of  this section. In the summary, the de-
Enrolled House Bill 2374 (HB 2374-A) Page 1
partment shall identify which contract preferences  state contracting agencies used in
procurements during the period described in subsection (1) of this section, which potentially
applicable contract preferences were  not used and reasons that state contracting agencies
gave for using or not using discretionary contract preferences.
(b) In the report described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the department shall re-
commend any changes in statute, administrative rule, policy or procedure the  department
determines are necessary to ensure that state contracting agencies apply contract prefer-
ences in accordance with the intent of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2374 (HB 2374-A) Page 2